Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1732
Integrated programs and policies; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Health and Human Services, the State Department of Education, the Department of Labor, the Office of Probation Administration, the Department of Correctional Services, and the Department of Economic Development will have integrated programs and policies when serving a common customer. Organizational mergers and operating agreements shall be developed within state government which bring together the state's community-based child-serving and family-serving resources in the areas of health care services, social services, mental health services, developmental disabilities services, juvenile justice, and education. Such actions shall eliminate the need for the public to understand the differing roles, responsibilities, and services of the agencies enumerated in this section and their affiliates.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 32;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 365;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 291.